Virginia statutes. Title 53.1. Prisons and Other Methods of Correction.
Article 6. Statewide Community-Based Corrections
System for State-Responsible Offenders.

§ 53.1-67.2.
Purpose.

The purposes of this article are to (i) provide effective protection of society and (ii) provide efficient and economical correctional services by establishing and maintaining appropriate sanction alternatives and by assisting state-responsible offenders who are incarcerated in returning to society as productive citizens, with the goal of reducing the incidence of repeat offenders.

History.

1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 1, 2.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 1 and 2, cl. 3 provides in pertinent part: “[T]he Department of Criminal Justice Services and the Department of Corrections may proceed with the development of such standards for the development, implementation, operation and evaluation of [this article] as may be necessary.”

§ 53.1-67.3.
Establishment of system.

The Director shall establish a statewide community-based system of programs, services and residential and nonresidential facilities for (i) those state-responsible offenders convicted of felonies and sentenced to alternative forms of punishment and (ii) those state-responsible offenders who the Director has determined, after a period of incarceration in a state or local correctional facility, require less secure confinement or a lower level of supervision. Facilities established pursuant to this article may be partially or completely physically restrictive with varying levels and types of offender control.

History.

1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 1, 2.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 1 and 2, cl. 6 provides: “That it is not the intent of this act to mandate local funding of any programs created under this act.”

§ 53.1-67.4.
Authority of Director; purchase of services authorized; location and notification.

Facilities established under this article may, in the discretion of the Director, be purchased, constructed or leased. The Director is further authorized to employ necessary personnel for these facilities. The Director may purchase such services as are deemed necessary in furtherance of this article. Such services may be provided by qualified public agencies or private agencies.

At least 90 days prior to (i) the issuance of a request for proposal for construction, (ii) the execution of a contract for the purchase of improved or unimproved land, or (iii) the execution or renewal of a lease agreement, notice shall be given by the Director to the chairman of the board of supervisors or mayor of the county, city, or town in which the facility is to be located. Such notice shall also be given to each adjacent land owner. In addition, if the local governing body in the jurisdiction where the facility is to be located so requests, the Department shall hold a public hearing in that jurisdiction.

History.

1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 1, 2; 1995, cc. 502, 574; 2006, c. 187; 2020, c. 759.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 187 inserted the A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph and added subsection B.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 759 deleted “pursuant to rules and regulations of the Board” preceding “may purchase” in the next-to-last sentence of subsection A.

§ 53.1-67.5.
Director to prescribe standards.

The Director shall prescribe standards for the development, implementation, operation, and evaluation of programs, services and facilities authorized by this article. The Director shall also prescribe guidelines for the transfer of offenders from a state or local correctional facility who the Director has determined should be placed in programs or facilities authorized under this article.

History.

1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 1, 2; 2020, c. 759.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 759 substituted “Director shall” for “Board shall” both times it appears.

§ 53.1-67.6.
Minimum programs.

The Statewide Community-Based Corrections System shall include, but not be limited to, the following programs, services and facilities: regular and intensive probation supervision, regular and intensive parole supervision for those state-responsible offenders sentenced for an offense committed prior to January 1, 1995, home/electronic incarceration, community corrections alternative programs, work release, pre-release centers, probation-violator and parole-violator centers, halfway houses and, for selected offenders, drug testing and treatment. The programs, facilities, and services required under this article shall be made available to each judicial circuit, but the manner in which such are provided shall be determined by the Director. Additional programs, services, and facilities may be established by the Director.

History.

1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 1, 2; 2019, c. 618.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 1 and 2, cl. 6 provides: “That it is not the intent of this act to mandate local funding of any programs created under this act.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 618 substituted “community corrections alternative programs” for “diversion center incarceration, boot camp incarceration, detention center incarceration”; and substituted “Director” for “Board” twice.